Illinois, session 104th, HB1439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 355.7 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/355.7 new)7    Sec. 355.7. Replacement of teeth. No insurer, dental 8service plan corporation, professional service corporation, 9insurance network leasing company, or any company that amends, 10delivers, issues, or renews an individual or group policy of 11accident and health insurance that provides dental insurance 12in this State may deny coverage for replacement of teeth to any 13insured on the basis of those teeth having been extracted or 14otherwise lost prior to the person becoming covered under the 15plan. 16    Section 10. The Dental Care Patient Protection Act is 17amended by adding Section 47 as follows: 18    (215 ILCS 109/47 new)19    Sec. 47. Replacement of teeth. No company offering a 20managed care dental plan or a point-of-service plan may deny 21coverage for replacement of teeth to any enrollee on the basis   HB1439- 2 -LRB104 05666 BAB 15696 b1of those teeth having been extracted or otherwise lost prior 2to the person becoming enrolled under the plan. 3    Section 15. The Dental Service Plan Act is amended by 4adding Section 30.5 as follows: 5    (215 ILCS 110/30.5 new)6    Sec. 30.5. Replacement of teeth. No dental service plan 7company may deny coverage for replacement of teeth to any 8beneficiary on the basis of those teeth having been extracted 9or otherwise lost prior to the person becoming a beneficiary.